Utah statutes.
76-5-406.5.   Circumstances required for probation or suspension of sentence
for certain sex offenses against a child.
(1)  In a case involving a conviction for a violation of Section 76-5-402.1,
rape of a child; Section 76-5-402.3, object rape of a child; Section
76-5-403.1, sodomy on a child; or any attempt to commit a felony under those
sections or a conviction for a violation of Subsections 76-5-404.1(4) and (5),
aggravated sexual abuse of a child, the court may suspend execution of
sentence and consider probation to a residential sexual abuse treatment center
only if all of the following circumstances are found by the court to be
present and the court in its discretion, considering the circumstances of the
offense, including the nature, frequency, and duration of the conduct, and
considering the best interests of the public and the child victim, finds
probation to a residential sexual abuse treatment center to be proper:
(a)  the defendant did not use a weapon, force, violence, substantial duress
or menace, or threat of harm, in committing the offense or before or after
committing the offense, in an attempt to frighten the child victim or keep the
child victim from reporting the offense;
(b)  the defendant did not cause bodily injury to the child victim during or
as a result of the offense and did not cause the child victim severe
psychological harm;
(c)  the defendant, prior to the offense, had not been convicted of any public
offense in Utah or elsewhere involving sexual misconduct in the commission of
the offense;
(d)  the defendant did not commit an offense described in this Part 4, Sexual
Offenses, against more than one child victim or victim, at the same time, or
during the same course of conduct, or previous to or subsequent to the instant
offense;
(e)  the defendant did not use, show, or display pornography or create
sexually-related photographs or tape recordings in the course of the offense;
(f)  the defendant did not act in concert with another offender during the
offense or knowingly commit the offense in the presence of a person other than
the victim or with lewd intent to reveal the offense to another;
(g)  the defendant did not encourage, aid, allow, or benefit from any act of
prostitution or sexual act by the child victim with any other person or sexual
performance by the child victim before any other person;
(h)  the defendant admits the offense of which he has been convicted and has
been accepted for mental health treatment in a residential sexual abuse
treatment center that has been approved by the Department of Corrections under
Subsection (3);
(i)  rehabilitation of the defendant through treatment is probable, based upon
evidence provided by a treatment professional who has been approved by the
Department of Corrections under Subsection (3) and who has accepted the
defendant for treatment;
(j)  prior to being sentenced, the defendant has undergone a complete
psychological evaluation conducted by a professional approved by the
Department of Corrections and:
(i)  the professional's opinion is that the defendant is not an exclusive
pedophile and does not present an immediate and present danger to the
community if released on probation and placed in a residential sexual abuse
treatment center; and
(ii)  the court accepts the opinion of the professional;
(k)  if the offense is committed by a parent, stepparent, adoptive parent, or
legal guardian of the child victim, the defendant shall, in addition to
establishing all other conditions of this section, establish it is in the
child victim's best interest that the defendant not be imprisoned, by
presenting evidence provided by a treatment professional who:
(i)  is treating the child victim and understands he will be treating the
family as a whole; or
(ii)  has assessed the child victim for purposes of treatment as ordered by
the court based on a showing of good cause; and
(l)  if probation is imposed, the defendant, as a condition of probation, may
not reside in a home where children younger than 18 years of age reside for at
least one year beginning with the commencement of treatment, and may not again
take up residency in a home where children younger than 18 years of age reside
during the period of probation until allowed to do so by order of the court.
(2)  A term of incarceration of at least 90 days is to be served prior to
treatment and continue until the time when bed space is available at a
residential sexual abuse treatment center as provided under Subsection (3) and
probation is to be imposed for up to a maximum of ten years.
(3) (a)  The Department of Corrections shall develop qualification criteria
for the approval of the sexual abuse treatment programs and professionals
under this section.  The criteria shall include the screening criteria
employed by the department for sexual offenders.
(b)  The sexual abuse treatment program shall be at least one year in
duration, shall be residential, and shall specifically address the sexual
conduct for which the defendant was convicted.
(4)  Establishment by the defendant of all the criteria of this section does
not mandate the granting under this section of probation or modification of
the sentence that would otherwise be imposed by Section 76-3-406 regarding
sexual offenses against children.  The court has discretion to deny the
request based upon its consideration of the circumstances of the offense,
including:
(a)  the nature, frequency, and duration of the conduct;
(b)  the effects of the conduct on any child victim involved;
(c)  the best interest of the public and any child victim; and
(d)  the characteristics of the defendant, including any risk the defendant
presents to the public and specifically to children.
(5)  The defendant has the burden to establish by a preponderance of evidence
eligibility under all of the criteria of this section.
(6)  If the court finds a defendant granted probation under this section fails
to cooperate or succeed in treatment or violates probation to any substantial
degree, the sentence previously imposed for the offense shall be immediately
executed.
(7)  The court shall enter written findings of fact regarding the conditions
established by the defendant that justify the granting of probation under this
section.
(8)  In cases involving conviction of any sexual offense against a child other
than those offenses provided in Subsection (1), the court shall consider the
circumstances described in Subsection (1) as advisory in determining whether
or not execution of sentence should be suspended and probation granted.  The
defendant is not required to satisfy all of those circumstances for
eligibility pursuant to this Subsection (8).
